District of Columbia statutes.
10-505.05

Transfer of member of Metropolitan Police to Capitol Police — Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)

The term “Metropolitan Police force” means the Metropolitan Police force of the District of Columbia.

(2)

The term “police service” means creditable service under § 5-704.

History

Dec. 20, 1979, 93 Stat. 1099, Pub. L. 96-152, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-120.